Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. General Provisions
§ 26-18-128.
Order of provisions of policy.

The provisions specified in W.S.

26-18-105

through

26-18-127

or any corresponding provisions used instead of the provisions in those sections shall be printed in the consecutive order of the provisions in W.S.

26-18-105

through

26-18-127

or, at the insurer’s option, any such provision may appear as a unit in any part of the policy, with other provisions to which it is logically related, provided that the resulting policy shall not be in any part unintelligible, ambiguous or likely to mislead a person to whom the policy is offered, delivered or issued.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 422; W.S. 1957; § 26.1-422; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-129.
Third-party ownership.

“Insured”, as used in this chapter, shall not be construed as preventing a person, other than the insured, with a proper insurable interest from making application for and owning a policy covering the insured or from being entitled under that policy to any indemnities, benefits and rights provided therein.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 423; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-423; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-130.
Requirements of other jurisdictions.

Any policy of a foreign or alien insurer, when delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this state, may contain any provision which is not less favorable to the insured or the beneficiary than the provisions of this chapter and which is prescribed or required by the law of the state or country under which the insurer is organized.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 424; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-424; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-131.
Policies issued for delivery in another state.

If any policy is issued by a domestic insurer for delivery to a person residing in another state, and if the insurance commissioner or corresponding public official of the other state informs the commissioner that the policy is not subject to approval or disapproval by the official, the commissioner, by ruling, may require that the policy meet the standards set forth in W.S.

26-18-103

through

26-18-130

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 425; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-425; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-132.
Policies less favorable than provisions of chapter prohibited.

Any policy provision which is not subject to this chapter shall not make a policy, or any portion thereof, less favorable in any respect to the insured or the beneficiary than the provisions of the policy which are subject to this chapter.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 426; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-426; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-133.
Age limit.

If a policy contains a provision establishing, as an age limit or otherwise, a date after which the coverage provided by the policy is not effective, and if that date falls within a period for which the insurer accepts a premium or if the insurer accepts a premium after that date, the coverage provided by the policy continues in force until the end of the period for which premium is accepted. If the insured’s age is misstated and if according to the insured’s correct age the coverage provided by the policy would not be effective, or would cease prior to the acceptance of the premium, the insurer’s liability is limited to the refund, upon request, of all premiums paid for the period not covered by the policy.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 7; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-147, 26.1-427; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 427; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-134.
Prohibited policy plans and provisions.

No insurer shall deliver or issue for delivery in this state any disability insurance policy:

Providing benefits or values for surviving or continuing policyholders contingent upon the lapse or termination for any reason of other policyholders policies;

Containing any clause, provision or agreement providing a premium, deposit or other payment for, or promising the distribution of, any bonus, special fund or guaranteed payment other than the insurance benefits specified in the policy, except that this restriction does not apply to the payment of dividends to the holders of participating policies.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 428; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-428; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-18-135.
Filing of rates; adherence to rates filed.

Each insurer issuing disability insurance policies for delivery in this state, before use thereof, shall file with the commissioner its premium rates and classification of risks pertaining to the policies. The insurer shall adhere to its rates and classifications as filed with the commissioner. The insurer may change the filings as it deems proper.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 429; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-429; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to rate filings generally, see §§

26-14-106

through

26-14-111

.

§ 26-18-136.
Franchise disability insurance.

Disability insurance on a franchise plan is that form of disability insurance issued to:

Four (4) or more employees of any corporation, copartnership or individual employer or any governmental corporation, agency or department thereof; or

Ten (10) or more members, employees or employees of members of any labor union or of any trade, professional or other association which:

Has a constitution or bylaws; and

Repealed by Laws 2003, Ch. 160, § 2.

Issues to the persons specified in this paragraph, with or without their dependents, the same form of an individual policy varying only as to amounts and kinds of coverage applied for by those persons under an arrangement in which the premiums on the policies may be paid to the insurer periodically by:

The employer, with or without payroll deductions;

The association or union for its members; or

Some designated person acting on behalf of the employer, association or union.

“Employees”, as used in this section, includes the officers, managers, employees and retired employees of the employer and the individual proprietor or partners if the employer is an individual proprietor or partnership.

Prior to marketing or offering any disability insurance for a franchise plan formed for the sole purpose of obtaining insurance, the producer shall file a written report with the department setting forth the name of the entity or entities, the insurer and its address and the offering producer and his address. The department shall keep the name of the association confidential.

The provisions of the Small Employer Health Insurance Availability Act, W.S.

26-19-301

et seq., shall apply to all insurance issued under this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 430; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-430; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2003, ch. 160, §§ 1, 2.

§ 26-18-137.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 15, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 51, § 2, related to coverage of dependent children. For present similar provisions, see §

26-15-135

.